Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3505
Board of trustees; officials and assistants; appoint; compensation.

The board of trustees of such facility or facilities as provided by section 23-3501 shall have power to appoint, remove, and fix the compensation of a suitable administrator, superintendent or matron, or two or more of such officials, and necessary assistants and in general carry out the spirit and intent of sections 23-3501 to 23-3509 in establishing and maintaining such facility or facilities.

Laws 1945, c. 44, § 5, p. 210;

Laws 1963, c. 114, § 5, p. 450;

Laws 1967, c. 121, § 5, p. 389;

Laws 1987, LB 134, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.04.